Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-107.3 of Title 26, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the State Election Board to be designated the “State Election
Board Voting System Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of
all monies received by the State Election Board from funds
appropriated by the Legislature provided for the purchase,
installation, maintenance, and security of a unitary, unified,
integrated system of election administration for this state as
described in Section 21-101 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State Election
Board for the purpose provided for in this section. Expenditures
from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State
Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the

Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1143 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1143 Page 3